South Dakota, session 2026, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 20-9:
An individual present at a shooting range assumes all associated risks, to the extent
the risks are obvious and inherent. Those risks include injuries that may result from:
(1) Noise;
(2) The discharge of any projectile or shot;
(3) A malfunction of shooting equipment not owned by the sport shooting range;
(4) Natural variations in terrain;
(5) Surface or subsurface snow or ice conditions; and
(6) Bare spots, rocks, trees, and other forms of natural growth or debris.
For purposes of this section, a "shooting range" means an area designed and
operated for the use of pistols, rifles, or shotguns, as a means of silhouette, skeet, trap,
black powder, or other shooting, and archery. A shooting range may be located on public
or private land, and may be operated by a public or a private entity, and includes. The
term does not include a law enforcement shooting range.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.